Ohio, session 136, HB842.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.079 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.079. The mineral "Celestine," a sulfate mineral appearing as sky-blue, white, pale yellow, colorless, or white orthorhomic crystals or in fibrous masses that is a major ore for strontium, whose compounds are responsible for the bright red flames in fireworks is hereby adopted as the official mineral of the state.